District of Columbia statutes.
28-5106

Art dealer; duties.

(a)

An art dealer who accepts a work of fine art, on a fee, commission, or other compensation basis, on consignment from the artist who created the work of fine art may use or display the work of fine art or a photograph of the work of fine art or permit the use or display of the work of fine art or a photograph of the work of fine art only if:

(1)

Notice is given to users or viewers that the work of fine art is the work of the artist; and

(2)

The artist gives prior written consent to the particular use or display.

(b)

An art dealer who accepts a work of fine art, on a fee, commission, or other compensation basis, on consignment from the artist who created the work of fine art shall compensate the artist for loss or damage to the consigned work of fine art.

Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-310, § 7, 57 DCR 12392
This section is referenced in § 28-5108.